Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-380
Motor vehicle or trailer owned by
dealer; presumption.

Any motor vehicle or trailer owned by
a dealer licensed under the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act and bearing other than dealer
license plates shall be conclusively presumed not to be a part of the dealer's
inventory and not for demonstration or sale and therefor not eligible for
any exemption from taxes or fees applicable to motor vehicles or trailers
with dealer license plates.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 80;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 9.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.